California, session 20252026, SB74.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8 (commencing with Section 65059.5) is added to Chapter 1.5 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, to read: Article 8. Infrastructure Gap-Fund Program65059.5. For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Additional projected costs” means costs beyond the initial budgeted costs for the infrastructure project, including, but not limited to, costs related to labor, materials, and additional permits. (b) “Infrastructure project” means a broadband, fire station, school, health and safety improvement, or road project.(c) “Local agency” means a county, city, city and county, or special district.(d) “Local taxes” means any tax imposed by a local agency by ordinance or pursuant to the California Constitution.(e) “Program” means the Infrastructure Gap-Fund Program established pursuant to Section 65059.6.(f) “Road project” means a project that decreases vehicle miles traveled on roads and improves the public health, safety, and welfare.65059.6. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the office shall establish the Infrastructure Gap-Fund Program to provide a grant to a local agency to develop for the development and construct construction of an infrastructure project. project facing unforeseen costs after starting construction.(b) The office may award a grant that provides funding for up to 20 percent of an infrastructure project’s additional projected cost after the project has started construction. The office shall only grant awards for projects that meet all of the following conditions:(1) The infrastructure project has started construction.(2) The local agency has identified additional projected costs.(3) The local agency has allocated existing local tax revenue to for at least 45 percent of the initial initially budgeted total cost of the infrastructure project’s total cost. project.(c) The local agency when applying to the program shall demonstrate both of the following:(1) Challenges with completing the project on time and on budget by providing an analysis of the additional costs not foreseen when the project started construction.(2) How the infrastructure project helps meet state and local goals by the construction of the infrastructure project. (d) The office shall develop guidelines to implement the program consistent with the requirements of this article that establish the criteria by which grant applications will be evaluated and funded.(e) This section article shall become operative on January 1, 2030.